Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB228.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 244 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A retail drink license under KRS Chapters 241 to 244 shall not be issued or
renewed without proof that the applicant or licensee is covered under a liquor
liability insurance policy in an amount not less than:
(a) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for the bodily injury or
death of one (1) person in any one (1) incident arising out of the sale or
service of alcoholic beverages on the licensed premises; and
(b) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for the bodily injury or death of
more than one (1) person in any one (1) incident arising out of the sale or
service of alcoholic beverages on the licensed premises.
(2) Proof of the insurance coverage required by this section shall be made to the
department in a form acceptable to the department.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/3/2025 2:40 PM Jacketed